DI-1130
DIAGNOSTICS - MULTIPLEX COMMUNICATION SYSTEM

DIAX4-01

DTC B1249 | Double lock communication stop

CIRCUIT INSPECTION

This DTC is output when communication stops between the Double lock ECU and the Body ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

No communication from double lock ECU for more than 10 *Double lock ECU
seconds. *Wire harness

B1249

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-1118.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check double lock ECU.

CHECK:

Check that the Double lock control system operates normally.

HINT:

With this inspection, whether or not the double lock ECU CPU functions normally can be diagnosed.

NG> Replace the double lock ECU (See page IN-38
)-
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2 [ Check wire harness. (See page IN-38)

PREPARATION:
Pull out the ECU connectors mentioned below.
Wire harness side connector of ECU Terminal
Double lock ECU - Body ECU MPX1 (D37-9) - MPX3 (B14-26)
CHECK:
Check continuity of the wire harness between the connectors.
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OK:

There is a continuity between the connectors.
HINT:
If there is OPEN in any wire harness, please repair it.

NG> Repair or replace wire harness.

Replace double lock ECU (See page
IN-38).
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